Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211
Lifetime revocation of motor vehicle operator's license; reduction; procedure.

Any person who prior to April 19, 1986, has had his or her motor vehicle operator's license revoked for life pursuant to section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 may submit an application to the court for a reduction of such lifetime revocation. The court in its discretion may reduce such revocation to a period of fifteen years.

Laws 1986, LB 153, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-669.38;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 306.

The commutation of a motor vehicle operator's license suspension by the judiciary is an improper use of a power reserved for the executive branch, and since the thrust of this section is toward that end, it is unconstitutional. State v. Diaz, 266 Neb. 966, 670 N.W.2d 794 (2003).

Where a criminal statute is amended to mitigate punishment, the sentence is that provided by a statute amended before final judgment absent a specific contrary legislative mandate. State v. Thompson, 224 Neb. 922, 402 N.W.2d 271 (1987).

In a case pending appeal when section 39-669.07 (transferred to section 60-6,196) was amended, a sentence of lifetime suspension of a driver's license for driving while under the influence should be vacated and in lieu thereof a sentence of suspension for 15 years imposed. State v. Painter, 224 Neb. 905, 402 N.W.2d 677 (1987).